Maine, session 132, LD201.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 9-A MRSA §2-202, sub-§7, as amended by PL 2011, c. 427, Pt. A, §5, is
further amended to read:
7. Unless otherwise provided for in Article 8‑A, with respect to consumer credit sales
made pursuant to a credit card, other than a lender credit card, a creditor may not impose a
finance charge if it is in excess of that set forth in the agreement between the consumer and
the creditor 24.9% per year on the unpaid balance on the credit card.
Sec. 2. 9-A MRSA §2-401, sub-§2, ¶A, as amended by PL 1997, c. 727, Pt. B,
§10, is further amended by amending subparagraph (i) to read:
(i) 30% 24.9% per year on that part of the unpaid balances of the amount financed
that is $2,000 or less;
Sec. 3. 9-A MRSA §2-402, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2011, c. 427, Pt. A, §6, is
further amended to read:
5. Unless otherwise provided for in Article 8‑A, with respect to loans made pursuant
to a lender credit card, a creditor may not impose a finance charge if it that is in excess of
that set forth in the agreement between the consumer and the creditor 24.9% per year on
the unpaid balance on the credit card. This subsection does not apply to open-end credit
plans secured by a consumer's principal dwelling or by a 2nd or vacation home of the
consumer.